Mississippi, session 2026, SB2081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 97-37-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-37-5.  (1)  (a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this section, it shall be unlawful for any person who has been convicted of a felony under the laws of this state, any other state, or of the United States to possess any firearm or any bowie knife, dirk knife, butcher knife, switchblade knife, metallic knuckles, blackjack, or any muffler or silencer for any firearm unless such person has received a pardon for such felony, has received a relief from disability pursuant to Section 925(c) of Title 18 of the United States Code, or has received a certificate of rehabilitation pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. (b)  (i)  It shall be lawful for any person who has been convicted of a nonviolent felony under the laws of this state, any other state, or of the United States to possess and use any firearm or any bowie knife, dirk knife, butcher knife, switchblade knife, metallic knuckles, blackjack, or any muffler or silencer five (5) years after the successful completion of all terms and conditions of the sentence for the conviction, including the payment of all ordered fines, fees, assessments, and restitution and the completion of any requirements of probation, parole, or early release. (ii)  For purposes of this paragraph, "nonviolent felony" shall mean a felony other than those felonies listed in Section 97-3-2(1) or designated as violent by the judge at sentencing under Section 97-3-2(2). (2)  Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or committed to the custody of the State Department of Corrections for not less than one (1) year nor more than ten (10) years, or both. (3)  A person who has been convicted of a felony under the laws of this state, under the laws of another state, under federal law or in state military court may apply for a certificate of rehabilitation as provided in this section.  If the person was convicted of a felony under the laws of this state, he or she may apply to the court in which he was convicted for a certificate of rehabilitation.  If the person was convicted of a felony under the laws of another state, under federal law or in state military court, he or she may apply to the court in the person's county of residence for a certificate of rehabilitation.  A person convicted of a felony under the laws of another state, under federal law or  in state military court shall attach a certified copy of his or her judgment and a certified copy of his or her completion of sentence to the petition for a certificate of rehabilitation.  The court may grant such certificate in its discretion upon a showing to the satisfaction of the court that the applicant has been rehabilitated and has led a useful, productive and law-abiding life since the completion of his or her sentence and upon the finding of the court that he or she will not be likely to act in a manner dangerous to public safety. (4)  (a)  A person who is discharged from court-ordered mental health treatment may petition the court which entered the commitment order for an order stating that the person qualifies for relief from a firearms disability. (b)  In determining whether to grant relief, the court must hear and consider evidence about: (i)  The circumstances that led to imposition of the firearms disability under 18 USCS, Section 922(d)(4); (ii)  The person's mental history; (iii)  The person's criminal history; and (iv)  The person's reputation. (c)  A court may not grant relief unless it makes and enters in the record the following affirmative findings: (i)  That the person is no longer likely to act in a manner dangerous to public safety; and (ii)  Removing the person's disability to purchase a firearm is not against the public interest. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.